Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-1217
Historic district, defined.

Historic district means any prehistoric or historic district, site, building, structure, or object included in, or eligible for inclusion in, the National Register of Historic Places, in accordance with Stipulation VI.D.1.a (i)-(v) of the Nationwide Programmatic Agreement for Review of Effects on Historic Properties for Certain Undertakings Approved by the Federal Communications Commission codified at 47 C.F.R. part 1, Appendix C, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2019, or designated pursuant to state historic preservation law if such designation exists at the time of application.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 17.